apertium-sme-smj.smj.lexc
LEXICON DeverbalNounsRAVGGAT
 +Der2+Actor:»@C.NeedNoun@  ACTORder ;
! +Der2+Actor+N:»@C.NeedNoun@ DenominalNounsActor ;    !not usual
 +Der3+Der/lis+A:»Y3liss LIS ;
 +Actio+Der3+Der/m:»m@C.NeedNoun@ BOAHTEM ;
 +Der3+Der/mus+N:»muss@C.NeedNoun@ MUS ;
! +Der3+Der/dahka+N:»X7dahka%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ; !does not seem usual (TO)
! +Der3+Der/dahka+N:»X7dahka%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ; !does not seem usual (TO)


LEXICON DeverbalNounsBASSALASSTET
 +Der2+Actor:»@C.NeedNoun@  ACTORTVder ;
 +Der3+Der/lis+A:»Y3liss LIS ;
 +Actio+Der3+Der/m:»m@C.NeedNoun@ BASSALASSTEMTV ;
 +Der3+Der/mus+N:»muss@C.NeedNoun@ MUS ;
! +Der3+Der/dahka+N:»X7dahka%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ; !does not seem usual (TO)
! +Der3+Der/dahka+N:»X7dahka%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ; !does not seem usual (TO)

LEXICON DeverbalNounsRAVGGALASSTET
 +Der2+Actor:»@C.NeedNoun@  ACTORder ;
 +Der3+Der/lis+A:»Y3liss LIS ;
 +Actio+Der3+Der/m:»m@C.NeedNoun@ BASSALASSTEM ;
 +Der3+Der/mus+N:»muss@C.NeedNoun@ MUS ;
! +Der3+Der/dahka+N:»X7dahka%> N-EVENSTRONGSTEM ; !does not seem usual (TO)
! +Der3+Der/dahka+N:»X7dahka%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ; !does not seem usual (TO)


LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBIEGGAT
 +Der1+Der/l+V:»l BIEKKASTITinfl ;                !Subitive
 +Der1+Der/ladda+V:»Y3ladda%> BIEGGATinfl ;     !Subitive-Freq
 +Der1+Der/lahtte+V:»lahtte%> BIEGGATinfl ;     !Subitive-Caus
 +Der1+Der/lasste+V:»lasste%> BIEGGATinfl ;     !Subitive-Dim
 +Der1+Der/st+V:»Q1st JÅLLÅRITINCH ;            !Dim
 +Der1+Der/stalla+V:»X7stalla%> BIEGGATinfl ;   !Dim-Freq
 +Der1+Der/stahtte+V:»Q1stahtte%> BIEGGATinfl ; !Dim-Caus
 +Der1+Der/stasste+V:»Q1stasste%> BIEGGATinfl ; !Double dim

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsDIEHTET
 +Der1+Der/d+V:e»Q1d9 JÅLLÅRITINCH ;             !Causative
 +Der1+Der/dalla+V:á»Q1dalla%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;     !Caus-Freq
 +Der2+Der/dahtte+V:e»Q1dahtte%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;   !Double Caus
 +Der1+Der/dasste+V:e»Q1dasste%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;   !Caus-Dim
 +Der1+Der/l+V:e»l JÅLLÅRITINCH ;                !Subitive
 +Der1+Der/ladda+V:á»ladda%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;     !Subitive-Freq
 +Der1+Der/lahtte+V:e»lahtte%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;     !Subitive-Caus
 +Der1+Der/lasste+V:e»lasste%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;     !Subitive-Dim
 +Der1+Der/st+V:e»Q1st JÅLLÅRITINCH ;            !Dim
 +Der1+Der/stalla+V:á»Q1stalla%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;   !Dim-Freq
 +Der1+Der/stahtte+V:e»Q1stahtte%> BASSALASSTETINCH ; !Dim-Caus
 +Der1+Der/stasste+V:e»Q1stasste%> BASSALASSTETINCH ; !Double dim


LEXICON DeverbalNounsDIEHTET
 +Actio+Der3+Der/m:»m@C.NeedNoun@ BOAHTEM ;
 +Der3+Der/mus+N:»muss@C.NeedNoun@ MUS ;


! Odd-syllable stems
!---------------------

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsJÅLLÅRIT
 +Der1+Der/ahtte+V:»ahtte%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;          !Caus
 +Der1+Der/alla+V:»Y4alla%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;          !Freq-cont
 +Der1+Der/asste+V:»asste%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;          !Dim
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V:»ahtja%> INFL-EVEN ;                 !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V:»ahtja DeverbalNounsBASSALASSTET ; !Inchoative


LEXICON DeverbalNounsJÅLLÅRIT
 +Actio+Der2+Der/ibme:»@C.NeedNoun@ VSBST-EVEN ;
 +Actio+N+Sg+Nom+Der4+Der/ahtes:» AHTES ;
 +Der2+Actor:»iddje@C.NeedNoun@ ACTOR ;
 +Der2+Der/ahkes:»ahkke SÁDNES ;

LEXICON DeverbalNounsUNNEDIT
 +Actio+Der2+Der/ibme:»@C.NeedNoun@ VSBST-EVENTV ;
 +Actio+N+Sg+Nom+Der4+Der/ahtes:» AHTES ;
 +Der2+Actor:»iddje@C.NeedNoun@ ACTORTV ;
 +Der2+Der/ahkes:»ahkke SÁDNES ;


LEXICON DeverbalNounsMUJTATJIT
 +Actio+Der2+Der/ibme:»@C.NeedNoun@ MUJTATJIBME ;
 +Actio+N+Sg+Nom+Der4+Der/ahtes:» AHTES ;
 +Der2+Actor:»iddje@C.NeedNoun@ ACTORTV ;
 +Der2+Der/ahkes:»ahkke SÁDNES ;

LEXICON DeverbalNounsBEGATJIT
 +Actio+Der2+Der/ibme:»@C.NeedNoun@ BEGATJIBME ;
 +Actio+N+Sg+Nom+Der4+Der/ahtes:» AHTES ;
 +Der2+Actor:»iddje@C.NeedNoun@ ACTORTV ;
 +Der2+Der/ahkes:»ahkke SÁDNES ;


LEXICON DeverbalVerbsVUORDDELIT
 +Der1+Der/ahtte+V:»ahtte%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;          !Caus
 +Der1+Der/adda+V:»Y4adda%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;          !Freq-cont
 +Der1+Der/asste+V:»asste%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;          !Dim
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V:»ahtja%> INFL-EVEN ;                 !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V:»ahtja%> DeverbalNounsBASSALASSTET ; !Inchoative


LEXICON DeverbalVerbsLASSÁNIT
 +Der1+Der/adda+V:»Y4adda%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;          !Freq-cont
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V:»ahtja%> INFL-EVEN ;                 !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V:»ahtja%> DeverbalNounsBASSALASSTET ; !Inchoative


LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBIEKKASTIT
 +Der1+Der/ahtte+V:»ahtte%> BIEGGATinfl ;          !Caus
 +Der1+Der/alla+V:»Y4alla%> BIEGGATinfl ;          !Freq-cont
 +Der1+Der/asste+V:»asste%> BIEGGATinfl ;          !Dim
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:»ahtja%>Y2 K ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:»ahtja%>Q1j K ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+Ind+ConNeg:»ahtja%>Q1 K ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+Pot+Sg3:»ahtja%>Q1sj K ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+Pot+ConNeg:»ahtja%>Q1tja K ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+Imprt+Sg3:»ahtja%>Y1is # ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+ImprtII+Sg3:»ahtja%>Y1us # ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+PrfPrc:»ahtja%>Y3m K ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+Inf:»ahtja%>t K ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+Ger:»ahtja%>Q1dijn K ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+GerII:»ahtja%>min K ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+Sup:»ahtja%>Q2tjit K ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+VAbess:»ahtja%>Q1k K ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+VAbess:»ahtja%>Q1dak K ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+VAbess:»ahtja%>Q1k VUOHTA ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+VAbess:»ahtja%>Q1dak VUOHTA ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+VGen:»ahtja%>Q1 K ; !Inchoative
 +Der1+Der/ahtja+V+Imprt+ConNeg:»ahtja%>Q1 # ; !Inchoative



! Contracted stems
! - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsOADDÁT
 +Der1+Der/d+V:»d9 JÅLLÅRITINCH ;             !Causative
 +Der1+Der/dalla+V:»dalla%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;     !Caus-Freq
 +Der2+Der/dahtte+V:»dahtte%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;   !Double Caus
 +Der1+Der/dasste+V:»dasste%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;   !Caus-Dim
 +Der1+Der/st+V:»st JÅLLÅRITINCH ;            !Dim
 +Der1+Der/stalla+V:»stalla%> BASSALASSTETINCH ;   !Dim-Freq
 +Der1+Der/stahtte+V:»stahtte%> BASSALASSTETINCH ; !Dim-Caus
 +Der1+Der/stasste+V:»stasste%> BASSALASSTETINCH ; !Double dim


LEXICON DeverbalNounsOADDÁT
 +Der2+Actor:»jiddje@C.NeedNoun@  ACTOR ;
 +Actio+Der3+Der/m:»m@C.NeedNoun@ OADDÁM ;
 +Der3+Der/mus+N:»muss@C.NeedNoun@ MUS ;

LEXICON DeverbalNounsTJUOLLÁT
 +Der2+Actor:»jiddje@C.NeedNoun@  ACTORTV ;
 +Actio+Der3+Der/m:»m@C.NeedNoun@ TJUOLLÁM ;
 +Der3+Der/mus+N:»muss@C.NeedNoun@ MUS ;


LEXICON DeverbalNounsSTRÁFFUT
 +Der2+Actor:»jiddje@C.NeedNoun@  ACTORTV ;
 +Actio+Der3+Der/m:»m@C.NeedNoun@ BOAHTEMTV ;
 +Der3+Der/mus+N:»muss@C.NeedNoun@ MUS ;

LEXICON DeverbalNounsDULLUT
 +Der2+Actor:»jiddje@C.NeedNoun@  ACTOR ;
 +Actio+Der3+Der/m:»m@C.NeedNoun@ BOAHTEM ;
 +Der3+Der/mus+N:»muss@C.NeedNoun@ MUS ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsSJIERRIT
 +Der1+Der/st+V:»st BIEKKASTITinfl ;            !Dim
 +Der1+Der/stalla+V:»stalla%> BIEGGATinfl ;   !Dim-Freq
 +Der1+Der/stahtte+V:»stahtte%> BIEGGATinfl ; !Dim-Caus
 +Der1+Der/stasste+V:»stasste%> BIEGGATinfl ; !Double dim


!Sublexicas deverbal nouns
!---------------------------

! vsubst
! These are actio forms

LEXICON VSBST-ODD
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:%>a R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>ij R ;
 +N:%> OTH-ODDCASE ;
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes:» AHTES ;

LEXICON VSBST-EVEN
 +N+Sg+Nom:ibme%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:im%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:ibme%> PxV ; !
 +N+SgNomCmp:im%> R ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:ime%> R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:imi%>j R ;
 +N+Ess:ibme%>Q1 K ;
 +N+Ess:ibme%>n K ;
 +N:ibme%>X4 ILL-EVENCASE ;
 +N:ibme%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Der4+Der/ahtes:» AHTES ;


LEXICON VSBST-EVENTV  !+CmpN/SgN +CmpN/DefSgGen +CmpN/DefPlGen +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft
 +N+Sg+Nom:ibme%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:im%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Use/Ped:ibme%> PxV ; !
 +N+SgNomCmp:im%> R ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:ime%> R ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:imi%>j R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom+Der4+Der/ahtes:» AHTES ;
 +N+Ess:ibme%>Q1 K ;
 +N+Ess:ibme%>n K ;
 +N:ibme%>X4 ILL-EVENCASE ;
 +N:ibme%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;

LEXICON NounRoot
 ådåstibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:ådåst VSBST-EVEN ; !
 ådåstuhttem+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:ådåstuhttem VSBST-ODD ; !
 åhtsålibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:åhtsål VSBST-EVEN ; !
 åhtsåm+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:åhtsåm VSBST-ODD ; !
 ájrastibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:ájrast VSBST-EVEN ; !
 aktanahttem+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:aktanahttem VSBST-ODD ; !
 álggo#tjuojadibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:álggo#tjuojad VSBST-EVEN ; !
 álmmuk#válljim+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:álmmuk#válljim VSBST-ODD ; !
 ás0sjeduhttem+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:ás'sjeduhttem VSBST-ODD ; !
 ávddadibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:ávddad VSBST-EVEN ; !
åvddånibme:åvddån VSBST-EVEN ;
 berustibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:berust VSBST-EVEN ; !
 doarjja#åhpadibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:doarjja#åhpad VSBST-EVEN ; !
 duol0lidibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:duol'lid VSBST-EVEN ; !
 duollom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:duollom VSBST-ODD ; !
 duosstom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:duosstom VSBST-ODD ; !
 garrastuhttem+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:garrastuhttem VSBST-ODD ; !
 giehtadallam+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:giehtadallam VSBST-ODD ; !
 giejddem+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:giejddem VSBST-ODD ; !
 guddnedibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:guddned VSBST-EVEN ; !
 guoradallam+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:guoradallam VSBST-ODD ; !
 hiehte#gádjom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:hiehte#gádjom VSBST-ODD ; !
 juogadibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:juogad VSBST-EVEN ; !
 maŋŋe#kalkulerim+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:maŋŋe#kalkulerim VSBST-ODD ; !
 mierredibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:mierred VSBST-EVEN ; !
 oahpestibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:oahpest VSBST-EVEN ; !
 oasse#máksem+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:oasse#máksem VSBST-ODD ; !
 ruhtadibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:ruhtad VSBST-EVEN ; !
 suonjardibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:suonjard VSBST-EVEN ; !
 tjálatjibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:tjálatj VSBST-EVEN ; !
 tjállem+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:tjállem VSBST-ODD ; !
 vuodo#investerim+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:vuodo#investerim VSBST-ODD ; !
 vuododibme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:vuodod VSBST-EVEN ; !
 vuosstáj#válldem+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:vuosstáj#válldem VSBST-ODD ; !
